Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.232

Contract goals for county electric ferry vessel procurement.

To increase small business participation in ferry vessel procurement, the Washington state department of transportation's office of equal opportunity shall establish contract goals for county electric ferry vessel procurement.

(1) The contract goal is defined as a percentage of the contract award amount that the prime contractor must meet by subcontracting with small business enterprises.

(2) Small business enterprises intending to benefit from the small business enterprise enforceable goals program established in this section must meet the definition of "small business" in RCW 39.26.010.

[ 2021 c 224 s 2.]